District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.02

Licensed graduate social worker.

(a)

The Board of Social Work shall license as a graduate social worker a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter, has a master’s degree or a doctorate from a social work program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education, and has satisfactorily completed the examination process at the graduate level.

(b)

A licensed graduate social worker (“L.G.S.W.”) may perform any function described as the practice of social work in this chapter, other than psychotherapy, under the supervision of a social worker licensed under § 3-1208.03 or § 3-1208.04, and may perform psychotherapy under the supervision of a social worker licensed under § 3-1208.04.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 802, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3308.2.